src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_34TULI ! tuli:tu%{lØ%}l
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_34TULI-SG ;
 N_34TULI_PL ;
LEXICON N_34TULI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_34TULI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI_PL ;

LEXICON N_34SUELI ! süli:sül
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_34SUELI-SG ;
 N_34SUELI_PL ;
LEXICON N_34SUELI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_34SUELI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI_PL ;

LEXICON N_35TARW
!! tarõ:tar
:õ ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_35TARW-SG ;
 N_35TARW_PL ;
LEXICON N_35TARW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_35TARW-SG ;
LEXICON N_35TARW_PL
:%{back%} NMN_35TARW_PL ;

LEXICON N_35UMA
!! uma:uma
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_35UMA-SG ;
 N_35UMA_PL ;
LEXICON N_35UMA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_35UMA_PL
:%{back%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_35PESAE
!! pesä:pesä
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_35PESAE-SG ;
 N_35PESAE_PL ;
LEXICON N_35PESAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_35PESAE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE_PL ;


LEXICON N_35NIMI
!! nimi:ni%{mØ%}m
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_35NIMI-SG ;
 N_35NIMI_PL ;
LEXICON N_35NIMI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
LEXICON N_35NIMI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI_PL ;

LEXICON N_35LUMI
!! lumi:lum
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_35LUMI-SG ;
 N_35LUMI_PL ;
LEXICON N_35LUMI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
LEXICON N_35LUMI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI_PL ;

LEXICON N_36TUUM1 !!= @CODE@ tuuḿ:t%{ou%}%{ou%}m
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36TUUM1-SG ;
 N_36TUUM1_PL ;
LEXICON N_36TUUM1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_36TUUM1/XX1-SG ;
LEXICON N_36TUUM1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_36TUUM1/XX1_PL ;

LEXICON N_36HANG1 !!= @CODE@ hanǵ:hang
:%^StrGStem%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36HANG1-SG ;
 N_36HANG1_PL ;
LEXICON N_36HANG1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-SG ;
LEXICON N_36HANG1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1_PL ;


LEXICON N_36SAERG1 !!= @CODE@ särǵ:sär%{gǵØ%}
:%^StrGStem%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36SAERG1-SG ;
        N_36SAERG1_PL ;
LEXICON N_36SAERG1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1-SG ;
LEXICON N_36SAERG1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1_PL ;

LEXICON N_36LAHT1 !!= @CODE@ laht́:lah%{tt́Ø%}
:%^StrGStem%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36LAHT1-SG ;
 N_36LAHT1_PL ;
LEXICON N_36LAHT1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_36LAHT1/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_36LAHT1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36LAHT1/XX_PL ;

LEXICON N_36PAEIV !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36PAEIV-SG ;
        N_36PAEIV_PL ;
LEXICON N_36PAEIV-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_36PAEIV-SG ;
LEXICON N_36PAEIV_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_36PAEIV_PL ;

LEXICON N_36LEIB !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36LEIB-SG ;
        N_36LEIB_PL ;
LEXICON N_36LEIB-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_36LEIB-SG ;
LEXICON N_36LEIB_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_36LEIB_PL ;

LEXICON N_36SILM !!= * @CODE@ silm:silm
!! harmony: front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_36SILM-SG ;
 N_36SILM_PL ;
LEXICON N_36SILM-SG
:%{front%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM-SG ;
LEXICON N_36SILM_PL
:%{front%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM_PL ;

LEXICON N_36RAMM !!= * @CODE@ ramm:ramm
!! harmony: back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_36RAMM-SG ;
 N_36RAMM_PL ;
LEXICON N_36RAMM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM-SG ;
LEXICON N_36RAMM_PL
:%{back%} NMN_36RAMM/SILM_PL ;

LEXICON N_36TIIM !!= * @CODE@ tiim:t%{ei%}%{ei%}m
!! harmony: front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_36TIIM-SG ;
 N_36TIIM_PL ;
LEXICON N_36TIIM-SG
:%{front%} NMN_36XX/TIIM-SG ;
LEXICON N_36TIIM_PL
:%{front%} NMN_36XX/TIIM_PL ;

LEXICON N_36NJUKR !!= * @CODE@ ńukr:ńu%{kg%}r
!! harmony: back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_36NJUKR-SG ;
 N_36NJUKR_PL ;
LEXICON N_36NJUKR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK-SG ;
LEXICON N_36NJUKR_PL
:%{back%} NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK_PL ;

LEXICON N_36LAEHK !!= * @CODE@ lähk:läh%{kØ%}
!! harmony: front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_36LAEHK-SG ;
 N_36LAEHK_PL ;
LEXICON N_36LAEHK-SG
:%{front%} NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK-SG ;
LEXICON N_36LAEHK_PL
:%{front%} NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK_PL ;

LEXICON N_36KOGWR
!! kogõr:kogõr
!! * Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
:%^Pen%^G1 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36KOGWR-SG ;
        N_36KOGWR_PL ;
LEXICON N_36KOGWR-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOGWR-SG ;
LEXICON N_36KOGWR_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOGWR_PL ;

LEXICON N_36KOKR
!! kokr:ko%{kg%}r
!! * Yaml: **N-kogwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
:%^G1 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_36KOKR-SG ;
        N_36KOKR_PL ;
LEXICON N_36KOKR-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOKR-SG ;
LEXICON N_36KOKR_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOKR_PL ;

!LEXICON N_36KATS1 !!= * @CODE@ katś:kat
! N_36KATS1-SG ;
! N_36KATS1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_36KATS1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1-SG ;
!LEXICON N_36KATS1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_36UETS1 !!= * @CODE@ ütś:üt
! N_36UETS1-SG ;
! N_36UETS1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_36UETS1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1-SG ;
!LEXICON N_36UETS1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1_PL ;


LEXICON N_46SWBWR
!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!! oblique plural in o
!! * Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_46SWBWR-SG ;
        N_46SWBWR_PL ;
LEXICON N_46SWBWR-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR-SG ;
LEXICON N_46SWBWR_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_46SWBWR_PL ;

LEXICON N_46KUBWL
!! kubõl:ku%{pb%}õl
!! oblique plural in õ
!! * Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
!! derived from 36särǵ
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_46KUBWL-SG ;
        N_46KUBWL_PL ;
LEXICON N_46KUBWL-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_46KUBWL-SG ;
LEXICON N_46KUBWL_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_46KUBWL_PL ;


LEXICON N_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_37PINI-SG ;
        N_37PINI_PL ;
LEXICON N_37PINI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-SG ;
LEXICON N_37PINI_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI_PL ;

LEXICON N_37WLI !!= @CODE@ õli:õli
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_37WLI-SG ;
        N_37WLI_PL ;
LEXICON N_37WLI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI-SG ;
LEXICON N_37WLI_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_37WLI/PINI_PL ;

LEXICON N_37MUNA !!= @CODE@ muna:mu%{nØ%}na
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_37MUNA-SG ;
        N_37MUNA_PL ;
LEXICON N_37MUNA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_37MUNA/PINI-SG ;
LEXICON N_37MUNA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_37MUNA/PINI_PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUNG
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38PUNG-SG ;
 N_38PUNG_PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUNG-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUNG_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG_PL ;

LEXICON N_38PULL1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38PULL1-SG ;
 N_38PULL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38PULL1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PULL1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_38VIKS1
:%{front%}%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%{front%}%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38VIKS1-SG ;
 N_38VIKS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38VIKS1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38VIKS1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_38PAPP1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38PAPP1-SG ;
 N_38PAPP1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38PAPP1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PAPP1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1_PL ;

LEXICON N_38REHK1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38REHK1-SG ;
 N_38REHK1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38REHK1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38REHK1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_38PAPP1/REHK1_PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUUM1 !puuḿ:poom
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^VOWRaise%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38PUUM1-SG ;
 N_38PUUM1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUUM1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUUM1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1_PL ;
