src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
jürituli+N:jüritu%{lØ%}l N_34TULI "_#tulõ, #tuld, #%{ˋØ%}tullõ__jüri|tuli_" ;
paganatuli+N:paganatu%{lØ%}l N_34TULI "_#õ, #d__paganatul|i_" ;
süli+N:sü%{lØ%}l N_34SUELI "_#e, #d__sül|i_" ;
uni+N:u%{nØ%}n N_34TULI "_#õ, #d__un|i_" ;
kooluperä+N:koolupe%{rØ%}rä N_35PESAE "_#ä, #rä__kooluper|ä_" ;
lumi+N:lu%{mØ%}m N_35LUMI "_#õ, #mõ__lum|i_" ;
madśa+N:ma%{td%}śa N_35UMA "_#dśa, #tśa__ma|dśa_" ;
magahustarõ+N:magahusta%{rØ%}rõ N_35TARW "_#õ, #rõ __magahustar|õ_" ;
munnõpühiq+N:munnõ#pü%{hØ%}hä N_35PESAE_PL "_#pühhi, #pühhi__munnõ|pühiq_" ;
nimi+N:ni%{mØ%}m N_35NIMI "_#e, #me__nim|i_" ;
perä+N:pe%{rØ%}rä N_35PESAE "_#ä, #rä__per|ä_" ;
ristinimi+N:ristini%{mØ%}m N_35NIMI "_#e, #me__ristinim|i_" ;
sidõ+N:si%{td%}õ N_35TARW "_#dõ, #tõ__si|dõ_" ;
surbteräq+N:surbte%{rØ%}rä N_35PESAE_PL "_#ri, #ri__surbter|äq_" ;
suvi+N:su%{vØ%}v N_35LUMI "_#õ, #võ__suv|i_" ;
talsipühiq+N:talsi#pü%{hØ%}hä N_35PESAE_PL "_#pühhi, #pühhi__talsi|pühiq_" ;
tsõdsõ+N:tsõ%{td%}sõ N_35TARW "_#dsõ, #tsõ__tsõ|dsõ_" ;
vanaesä+N:vanae%{sØ%}sä N_35PESAE "_#, vannaessä__vanaesä_" ;
väärnimi+N:väärni%{mØ%}m N_35NIMI "_#e, #me __väärnim|i_" ;
jahheleht́+N:jahheleh%{tt́Ø%} N_36SAERG1 "_#lehe, #%{ˋØ%}lehte__jahhe|leht́_" ;
katripäiv+N:%{ˋØ%}#katripäiv N_36PAEIV "_#päävä, #%{ˋØ%}päivä__ˋkatri|päiv_" ;
kogõr+N:ko%{kg%}õr N_36KOGWR "_kogrõ, %{ˋØ%}kokrõ __kogõr_" ;
krõpõkülm+N:krõpõkülm N_36SILM "_#külmä, #%{ˋØ%}külmä__krõpõ|külm_" ;
kärǵ+N:kär%{gǵØ%} N_36SAERG1 "_käre, %{ˋØ%}kärge__kärǵ_" ;
kärk+N:kär%{kg%} N_36LAEHK "_kärgä, %{ˋØ%}kärkä__kärk_" ;
lell+N:lell N_36SILM "_lellä, %{ˋØ%}lellä__lell_" ;
maaḱ+N:maa%{kḱg%} N_36HANG1 "_maagõ, %{ˋØ%}maakõ__maaḱ_" ;
madissõpäiv+N:madissõpäiv N_36PAEIV "_#päävä, #%{ˋØ%}päivä__madissõ|päiv_" ;
mügrämütt+N:mügrämü%{tØ%}t N_36LAEHK "_#ä, #tä__mügrämüt|t_" ;
peeleq+N:p%{ei%}%{ei%}l N_36TIIM "_ˋpi̬i̬li, %{ˋØ%}pi̬i̬li__peeleq_" ;
ramm+N:ramm N_36RAMM "_ramma, %{ˋØ%}ramma__ramm_" ;
rättsepp+N:rättse%{pØ%}p N_36LAEHK "_#ä, #pä__rättsep|p_" ;
seiḿ+N:sei%{mḿ%} N_36SAERG1 "_seime, %{ˋØ%}seime__seiḿ_" ;
siik+N:s%{ei%}%{ei%}k N_36TIIM "_seegä, si̬i̬kä__si̬i̬k_" ;
suukurǵ+N:su̬u̬#kur%{gǵØ%} N_36HANG1 "_#kurõ, #%{ˋØ%}kurgõ__su̬u̬|kurǵ_" ;
tiim+N:t%{ei%}%{ei%}m N_36TIIM "_teemä, ti̬i̬mä__ti̬i̬m_" ;
tsäärpiim+N:tsäärpiim N_36SILM "_#piimä, #%{ˋØ%}piimä__tsäär|piim_" ;
tuhapäiv+N:tuhapäiv N_36PAEIV "_#päävä, #%{ˋØ%}päivä__tuha|päiv_" ;
tuuḿ+N:t%{ou%}%{ou%}%{mḿ%} N_36TUUM1 "_toomõ, tu̬u̬mõ__tu̬u̬ḿ_" ;
suuḿ+N:s%{ou%}%{ou%}%{mḿ%} N_36TUUM1 "_soomõ, su̬u̬mõ__su̬u̬ḿ_" ;
haukasulǵ+N:hauka#sul%{gǵØ%} N_36HANG1 "_sulõ, %{ˋØ%}sulgõ__sulǵ_" ;
jubi+N:ju%{pb%}i N_37WLI "_#bi, #pi __ju|bi_" ;
kidsi+N:ki%{td%}si N_37PINI "_#dsi, #tsi__ki|dsi_" ;
kõri+N:kõ%{rØ%}ri N_37WLI "_#i, #ri__kõr|i_" ;
liba+N:li%{pb%}a N_37MUNA "_#ba, #pa__li|ba_" ;
pigi+N:pi%{kg%}i N_37PINI "_#gi, #ki__pi|gi_" ;
pira+N:pi%{rØ%}ra N_37MUNA "_#a, #ra__pir|a_" ;
robi+N:ro%{pb%}i N_37WLI "_#bi, #pi __ro|bi_" ;
tibi+N:ti%{pb%}i N_37PINI "_#bi, #pi __ti|bi_" ;
tudśa+N:tu%{td%}śa N_37MUNA "_#dśa, #tśa__tu|dśa_" ;
krõõń+N:kr%{õy%}%{õy%}%{nń%} N_38PUUM1 "_krõõni, krõ̭õ̭ni__krõ̭õ̭ń_" ;
must+N:must N_38PUNG "_musta, %{ˋØ%}musta__must_" ;
näopilt́+N:näopil%{td%} N_38REHK1 "_#pildi, #%{ˋØ%}pilti__näo|pilt́_" ;
olalatt́+N:olala%{tØ%}%{tt́%} N_38PAPP1 "_#i, #ti__olalat|t́_" ;
paldõrjaań+N:paldõrjaa%{nń%} N_38PULL1 "_#jaani, #%{ˋØ%}jaani__paldõr|jaań_" ;
pung+N:pung N_38PUNG "_punga, %{ˋØ%}punga __pung_" ;
puuḿ+N:p%{ou%}%{ou%}%{mḿ%} N_38PUUM1 "_poomi, pu̬u̬mi__pu̬u̬ḿ_" ;
tunnismärḱ+N:tunnismär%{kg%} N_38REHK1 "_#märgi, #%{ˋØ%}märki__tunnis|märḱ_" ;
umbots+N:umbots N_38PUNG "_#otsa, #%{ˋØ%}otsa__umb|ots_" ;
variant́+N:varian%{td%} N_38PAPP1 "_#andi, #%{ˋØ%}anti__vari|ant́_" ;
võrkpalĺ+N:võrkpal%{lĺ%} N_38PULL1 "_#palli, #%{ˋØ%}palli__võrkpalĺ_" ;
kubõl+N:ku%{pb%}õl N_46KUBWL "_kubla, %{ˋØ%}kupla __kubõl_" ;
mugõl+N:mu%{kg%}õl N_46KUBWL "_mugla, %{ˋØ%}mukla __mugõl_" ;
leht́adõr+N:leht́a%{td%}õr N_46SWBWR "_#adra, #%{ˋØ%}atra__leht́|adõr_" ;
pussusõgõl+N:pussusõ%{kg%}õl N_46SWBWR "_#sõgla, #%{ˋØ%}sõkla__pussu|sõgõl_" ;
sõgõl+N:sõ%{kg%}õl N_46SWBWR "_sõgla, %{ˋØ%}sõkla __sõgõl_" ;
